en: Power Strips & Surge Suppressors
xx: Power Strips & Surge Suppressors
cs: Prodlužovací kabely a přepěťové ochrany
da: Strøm – stikdåser og overspændingsbeskyttelse
de: Steckdosenleisten & Überspannungsschutz
es: Supresores de sobretensión y regletas
fr: Multiprises & parasurtenseurs, Multiprise
it: Ciabatte e soppressori di sovratensione
ja: テーブルタップ
nl: Stekkerdozen en piekspanningsbeveiliging
no: Forgrenere med/uten overspenningsvern
pl: Listwy antyprzepięciowe
pt: Filtros de linha e estabilizadores
ru: Удлинители и сетевые фильтры
sv: Grenuttag och överspänningsskydd
tr: Anahtarlı Uzatma Kabloları ve Aşırı Akım Korumalı Prizler

en: Power Supply Enclosures
xx: Power Supply Enclosures
cs: Skříně pro napájecí zdroje
da: Strømforsyningskabinetter
de: Gehäuse für Stromversorgungsgeräte
es: Cajas de electricidad
fr: Boîtiers d'alimentation électrique
it: Contenitori per gruppi elettrogeni
ja: 電源筐体
nl: Voedingsbehuizingen
no: Strømkabinetter
pl: Obudowy zasilaczy
pt: Caixas de força
ru: Корпуса и шкафы для систем электропитания
sv: Elskåp
tr: Güç Kaynağı Kutuları

en: Laptop external power supply
fr: Alimentation externe pour ordinateur portable

en: Smartphone external power supply
fr: Alimentation externe pour smartphone ou tablette

en: Power banks
xx: Powerbanks
cs: Powerbanka
et: Akupank
fr: Batterie externe
ja: モバイルバッテリー
ko: 보조 배터리
nb: Batteribanker
nl: Noodlader
ru: Внешний аккумулятор
sv: Batteripack
tr: Taşınabilir şarj aleti
ug: توك بانكىسى
zh: 移动电源, 行動電源, 流動充電器

en: Surge Protection Devices
xx: Surge Protection Devices
cs: Přepěťové ochrany
da: SPD-enheder
de: Überspannungsschutzgeräte
es: Dispositivos de protección contra sobretensiones
fr: Parafoudres
it: Dispositivi di protezione contro le sovratensioni
ja: サージ防護デバイス
nl: Piekspanningsbeveiligingen
no: Overspenningsvern
pl: Urządzenia do ochrony przeciwprzepięciowej
pt: Dispositivos de proteção contra sobrecargas de energia
ru: Устройства для защиты от импульсных перенапряжений
sv: Överspänningsskydd
tr: Aşırı Akım Koruma Cihazları

en: Travel Converters & Adapters
xx: Travel Converters & Adapters
cs: Cestovní adaptéry
da: Rejseadaptere
de: Reiseadapter
es: Adaptadores de viaje
fr: Adaptateurs et convertisseurs de voyage
it: Adattatori da viaggio
ja: 旅行用アダプター
nl: Reisadapters
no: Reiseadaptere
pl: Zasilacze podróżne
pt: Adaptadores de viagem
ru: Туристические переходники и адаптеры
sv: Reseadaptrar
tr: Seyahat Adaptörleri

en: UPS
xx: UPS
cs: UPS
da: UPS-nødstrømsforsyning
de: USV
es: Baterías auxiliares
fr: Systèmes d'alimentation sans interruption
it: Unità backup batteria
ja: UPS
nl: Noodstroomapparaten
no: Avbruddsfrie strømforsyninger
pl: Zasilacze UPS
pt: UPS
ru: Источники бесперебойного питания
sv: UPS-enheter
tr: Kesintisiz Güç Kaynakları

en: UPS Accessories
xx: UPS Accessories
cs: Záložní zdroje – příslušenství
da: UPS – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für USV
es: Accesorios UPS
fr: Accessoires pour systèmes d'alimentation sans interruption
it: Accessori UPS
ja: UPS関連用品
nl: UPS-accessoires
no: Tilbehør til avbruddsfrie strømforsyninger
pl: Akcesoria do zasilaczy UPS
pt: Acessórios para UPS
ru: Принадлежности для ИБП
sv: UPS-tillbehör
tr: UPS Aksesuarları

en: Remote Controls
xx: Remote Controls
cs: Dálková ovládání
da: Fjernbetjeninger
de: Fernbedienungen
es: Mandos a distancia
fr: Télécommandes, Télécommande
it: Telecomandi
ja: リモコン
nl: Afstandsbedieningen
no: Fjernkontroller
pl: Piloty
pt: Controles remotos
ru: Пульты дистанционного управления
sv: Fjärrkontroller
tr: Uzaktan Kumandalar

en: Signal Boosters
xx: Signal Boosters
cs: Zesilovače signálu
da: Signalforstærkere
de: Signalverstärker
es: Amplificadores de señal
fr: Amplificateurs de signal
it: Amplificatori di segnale
ja: シグナルブースター
nl: Signaalboosters
no: Signalforsterkere
pl: Wzmacniacze sygnału
pt: Amplificadores de sinal
ru: Усилители сигналов
sv: Signalförstärkare
tr: Sinyal Güçlendiriciler

en: Signal Jammers
xx: Signal Jammers
cs: Rušičky signálu
da: Støjsendere
de: Signalstörer
es: Inhibidores de señales
fr: Brouilleurs de signal
it: Disturbatori di segnale
ja: シグナルジャマー
nl: Stoorzenders
no: Støysendere
pl: Zagłuszacze sygnału
pt: Bloqueadores de sinal
ru: Глушители сигналов
sv: Signalblockerare
tr: Sinyal Bozucular

en: GPS Jammers
xx: GPS Jammers
cs: Rušičky signálu GPS
da: GPS-støjsendere
de: GPS-Störsender
es: Inhibidores de GPS
fr: Brouilleurs GPS
it: Disturbatori di segnale GPS
ja: GPSジャマー
nl: GPS-jammers
no: GPS-jammere
pl: Zagłuszacze sygnału GPS
pt: Bloqueadores de GPS
ru: Глушители GPS
sv: GPS-blockerare
tr: GPS Sinyali Bozucular

en: Mobile Phone Jammers
xx: Mobile Phone Jammers
cs: Rušičky mobilních telefonů
da: Mobilstøjsendere
de: Mobiltelefon-Störsender
es: Inhibidores de telefonía móvil
fr: Brouilleurs de téléphone mobile
it: Disturbatori di segnale per telefoni cellulari
ja: 携帯電話ジャマー
nl: Signaalstoorders voor mobiele telefoons
no: Mobiltelefon-jammere
pl: Zagłuszacze sygnału sieci komórkowej
pt: Bloqueadores de celulares
ru: Глушители сигналов мобильных телефонов
sv: Mobiltelefonblockerare
tr: Cep Telefonu Sinyali Bozucular

en: Radar Jammers
xx: Radar Jammers
cs: Antiradary
da: Radarstøjsendere
de: Radarstörer
es: Interceptores de radares
fr: Brouilleurs de radar
it: Radar jammer
ja: レーダージャマー
nl: Radarstoorzenders
no: Radar-jammere
pl: Zagłuszacze radarów
pt: Transmissores de radar
ru: Радарные глушители
sv: Radarblockerare
tr: Radar Sinyali Bozucular

en: GPS Accessories
xx: GPS Accessories
cs: GPS – příslušenství
da: GPS – tilbehør
de: GPS-Zubehör
es: Accesorios GPS
fr: Accessoires pour GPS
it: Accessori per GPS
ja: GPSアクセサリー
nl: GPS-accessoires
no: GPS-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do GPS-ów
pt: Acessórios para GPS
ru: Принадлежности для устройств GPS
sv: GPS-tillbehör
tr: GPS Cihazı Aksesuarları

en: GPS Cases
xx: GPS Cases
cs: Pouzdra na GPS
da: GPS – covers
de: GPS-Taschen
es: Fundas para GPS
fr: Housses pour GPS
it: Custodie GPS
ja: GPSケース
nl: GPS-hoezen
no: GPS-etuier
pl: Futerały na GPS-y
pt: Estojos para GPS
ru: Чехлы для устройств GPS
sv: GPS-fodral
tr: GPS Cihazı Kılıfları

en: GPS Mounts
xx: GPS Mounts
cs: Držáky na autonavigaci (GPS)
da: GPS – montering
de: GPS-Halterungen
es: Soporte para GPS de vehículo
fr: Supports de GPS
it: Supporti GPS per veicoli
ja: GPS車載マウント
nl: GPS-houders voor voertuigen
no: GPS-fester
pl: Uchwyty do GPS-ów
pt: Suportes para GPS veicular
ru: Крепления для устройств GPS
sv: GPS-monteringar
tr: GPS Cihazı Montaj Kitleri

en: GPS Navigation Systems
xx: GPS Navigation Systems
cs: GPS navigace
da: GPS
de: GPS-Navigationssysteme
es: Sistemas de navegación GPS
fr: Systèmes de navigation GPS, GPS
it: Sistemi GPS
ja: GPSナビ
nl: GPS-navigatiesystemen
no: GPS-navigasjonssystemer
pl: GPS-y
pt: Sistemas de navegação GPS
ru: GPS-навигаторы
sv: GPS
tr: GPS Navigasyon Sistemleri

en: GPS Tracking Devices
xx: GPS Tracking Devices
cs: GPS lokátory
da: GPS-sporingsenheder
de: GPS-Tracker
es: Localizadores GPS
fr: Traceurs GPS
it: Localizzatori GPS
ja: GPSトラッカー
nl: GPS-trackers
no: GPS-sporingsenheter
pl: Lokalizatory GPS
pt: Rastreadores com GPS
ru: GPS-трекеры
sv: GPS-spårare
tr: GPS Takip Cihazları